Washington statutes.
RCW 13.34.245

Voluntary consent to foster care placement for Indian child—Validation—Withdrawal of consent—Termination.

(1) Where any parent or Indian custodian voluntarily consents to foster care placement of an Indian child and a petition for dependency has not been filed regarding the child, such consent shall not be valid unless executed in writing before the court and filed with the court. The consent shall be accompanied by the written certification of the court that the terms and consequences of the consent were fully explained in detail to the parent or Indian custodian during the court proceeding and were fully understood by the parent or Indian custodian. The court shall also certify in writing either that the parent or Indian custodian fully understood the explanation in English or that it was interpreted into a language that the parent or Indian custodian understood. Any consent given prior to, or within ten days after, the birth of the Indian child shall not be valid.

(2) To obtain court validation of a voluntary consent to foster care placement, any person may file a petition for validation alleging that there is located or residing within the county an Indian child whose parent or Indian custodian wishes to voluntarily consent to foster care placement of the child and requesting that the court validate the consent as provided in this section. The petition shall contain the name, date of birth, and residence of the child, the names and residences of the consenting parent or Indian custodian, and the name and location of the Indian tribe in which the child is a member or eligible for membership. The petition shall state whether the placement preferences of 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1915 (b) or (c) will be followed. Reasonable attempts shall be made by the petitioner to ascertain and set forth in the petition the identity, location, and custodial status of any parent or Indian custodian who has not consented to foster care placement and why that parent or Indian custodian cannot assume custody of the child.

(3) Upon filing of the petition for validation, the clerk of the court shall schedule the petition for a hearing on the court validation of the voluntary consent no later than forty-eight hours after the petition has been filed, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. Notification of time, date, location, and purpose of the validation hearing shall be provided as soon as possible to the consenting parent or Indian custodian, the department which is to assume responsibility for the child's placement and care pursuant to the consent to foster care placement, and the Indian tribe in which the child is enrolled or eligible for enrollment as a member. If the identity and location of any nonconsenting parent or Indian custodian is known, reasonable attempts shall be made to notify the parent or Indian custodian of the consent to placement and the validation hearing. Notification under this subsection may be given by the most expedient means, including, but not limited to, mail, personal service, telephone, and telegraph.

(4) Any parent or Indian custodian may withdraw consent to a voluntary foster care placement, made under this section, at any time. Unless the Indian child has been taken in custody pursuant to RCW 13.34.050 or 26.44.050, placed in shelter care pursuant to RCW 13.34.060, or placed in foster care pursuant to RCW 13.34.130, the Indian child shall be returned to the parent or Indian custodian upon withdrawal of consent to foster care placement of the child.

(5) Upon termination of the voluntary foster care placement and return of the child to the parent or Indian custodian, the department which had assumed responsibility for the child's placement and care pursuant to the consent to foster care placement shall file with the court written notification of the child's return and shall also send such notification to the Indian tribe in which the child is enrolled or eligible for enrollment as a member and to any other party to the validation proceeding including any noncustodial parent.

[ 2018 c 284 s 24; 2009 c 520 s 39; 1997 c 386 s 18; 1987 c 170 s 2.]

NOTES:

Application—1997 c 386: See note following RCW 13.50.010.

Severability—1987 c 170: See note following RCW 13.04.030.